Virginia statutes. Title 23.1. Institutions of Higher Education; Other Educational and Cultural Institutions.
Article 4. Restructured Financial and Administrative Authority; Covered Institutions; Management Agreements.

§ 23.1-1004.
Management agreement; eligibility and application.

The governing board and administration of each public institution of higher education that meets the state goals set forth in subsection A of §

23.1-1002

and meets the requirements of this article to demonstrate the ability to manage successfully the administrative and financial operations of the institution without jeopardizing the financial integrity and stability of the institution may negotiate with the Governor to develop a management agreement with the Commonwealth to exercise restructured financial and administrative authority.

No public institution of higher education shall enter into a management agreement unless:

Its most current and unenhanced bond rating received from Moody’s Investors Service, Inc., Standard & Poor’s, Inc., or Fitch Investor’s Services, Inc., is at least AA- (i.e., AA minus) or its equivalent, provided that such bond rating has been received within the last three years of the date that the initial management agreement is entered into; or

The institution has participated in decentralization pilot programs in the areas of finance and capital outlay, demonstrated management competency in those two areas as evidenced by a written certification from the Cabinet Secretary designated by the Governor, received restructured operational authority under a memorandum of understanding pursuant to Article 3 (§

23.1-1003

et seq.) in at least one functional area, and demonstrated management competency in that area for a period of at least two years;

2.

At least an absolute two-thirds of the institution’s governing board has voted in the affirmative for a resolution in support of a request for restructured operational authority under a management agreement;

3.

The institution submits to the Governor a written request for his approval of the management agreement that contains evidence that (i) the institution possesses the necessary administrative infrastructure, experience, and expertise to perform successfully its public educational mission as a covered institution; (ii) the institution is financially able to operate as a covered institution without jeopardizing the financial integrity and stability of the institution; (iii) the institution consistently meets the financial and administrative management standards pursuant to §

23.1-1001

; and (iv) the institution’s governing board has adopted performance and accountability standards, in addition to any institutional performance benchmarks included in the general appropriation act and developed pursuant to §

23.1-206

, against which its implementation of the restructured operational authority under the management agreement can be measured;

4.

The institution provides a copy of the written request to the Chairmen of the House Committee on Appropriations, the House Committee on Education, the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations, and the Senate Committee on Education and Health;

5.

The institution agrees to reimburse the Commonwealth for any additional costs that the Commonwealth incurs to provide health or other group insurance benefits to employees and undertake any risk management program that are attributable to the institution’s exercise of restructured operational authority. The Secretary of Finance and the Secretary of Administration, in consultation with the Virginia Retirement System and the affected institutions, shall establish procedures for determining any amounts to be paid by each institution and a mechanism for transferring the appropriate amounts directly and solely to the affected programs;

6.

The institution considers potential future impacts of tuition increases on the Virginia College Savings Plan and discusses such potential impacts with parties participating in the development of the management agreement. The chief executive officer of the Virginia College Savings Plan shall provide to the institution and such parties the Plan’s assumptions underlying the contract pricing of the program; and

7.

The Governor transmits a draft of any management agreement that affects insurance or benefit programs administered by the Virginia Retirement System to the Board of Trustees of the Virginia Retirement System, which shall review the relevant provisions of the management agreement to ensure compliance with the applicable provisions of Title 51.1, administrative policies and procedures, and federal regulations governing retirement plans and advise the Governor and appropriate Cabinet Secretaries of any conflicts.

History.

2005, cc. 933, 945, §§ 23-38.88, 23-38.91, 23-38.97; 2006, c. 775; 2009, cc. 827, 845; 2011, cc. 828, 869; 2013, c. 482; 2014, c. 628; 2016, c. 588; 2017, c. 314.

Cross references.

As to conveyance and transfers of real property by state agencies, see §

2.2-1150

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2017, c. 314, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall be effective retroactively to October 1, 2016.”

Acts
2019, cc. 124 and
125, cl. 1 enacted a management agreement by and between the Commonwealth of Virginia and James Madison University.

Acts
2019, cc. 124 and
125, cl. 2 provides: “That notwithstanding the provisions of subsections A and B of
§

23.1-1007

of the Code of Virginia, the management agreement negotiated by James Madison University (the University) shall continue in effect unless the Governor, the General Assembly, or the University determines that the management agreement needs to be renegotiated or revised.”

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations” for “Senate Committee on Finance.” March 10, 2021.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 314, effective retroactively to October 1, 2016, in subsection A, inserted “board” preceding “and administration” and substituted “public institution” for “public institutions.”

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Wage requirements under public work contracts. —

Unless otherwise exempted by specific statutes outside of the Virginia Public Procurement Act ( §

2.2-4300

et seq.), the prevailing wage requirements for public works contracts under the Virginia Public Procurement Act apply to institutions of higher education in Virginia. See opinion of Attorney General to Hon. Mark D. Sickles, Member, House of Delegates, 21-041, 2021 Va. AG LEXIS 18 (5/24/21).

§ 23.1-1005.
Approval of a management agreement.

If the Governor finds that the public institution of higher education meets the criteria set forth in §

23.1-1004

, he shall authorize the appropriate Cabinet Secretary to enter into a management agreement with the governing board of such institution.

Each such management agreement shall be submitted no later than the succeeding November 15 to the House Committee on Appropriations, the House Committee on Education, the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations, and the Senate Committee on Education and Health. The Governor shall include a recommendation for approval of the management agreement with the public institution of higher education in “The Budget Bill” submitted pursuant to subsection A of §

2.2-1509

or in his gubernatorial amendments submitted pursuant to subsection E of §

2.2-1509

due by the December 20 that immediately follows the date of submission of the management agreement to such Committees.

The General Assembly shall consider whether to approve or disapprove the management agreement as recommended. If the management agreement is approved as part of the general appropriation act, it shall become effective on the effective date of such general appropriation act.

History.

2005, cc. 933, 945, § 23-38.97; 2016, c. 588.

Editor’s note.

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations” for “Senate Committee on Finance.” March 10, 2021.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Wage requirements under public work contracts. —

Unless otherwise exempted by specific statutes outside of the Virginia Public Procurement Act ( §

2.2-4300

et seq.), the prevailing wage requirements for public works contracts under the Virginia Public Procurement Act apply to institutions of higher education in Virginia. See opinion of Attorney General to Hon. Mark D. Sickles, Member, House of Delegates, 21-041, 2021 Va. AG LEXIS 18 (5/24/21).

§ 23.1-1006.
Management agreement; contents and scope.

Each covered institution that complies with the requirements of this article shall have the powers set forth in this article that are expressly included in the management agreement.

Each management agreement shall include:

A copy of the governing board’s resolution in support of a request for restructured operational authority;

The institution’s express agreement to reimburse the Commonwealth for any additional costs that the Commonwealth incurs to provide health or other group insurance benefits to employees and undertake any risk management program that are attributable to the institution’s exercise of restructured operational authority;

The institution’s undergraduate Virginia student enrollment, financial aid requirements and capabilities, and tuition policy for undergraduate Virginia students; and

A statement of the Governor’s power to void the management agreement pursuant to subsection E of §

23.1-1007

.

There is a presumption that restructured operational authority is not included in the management agreement, and such authority shall only be granted to a covered institution if it is expressly included in the management agreement. The only implied authority that is granted to a covered institution is that which is necessary to carry out the express grant of restructured operational authority. Each covered institution shall be governed and administered in the manner provided in (i) this article but subject to the expressed terms of the management agreement, (ii) the general appropriation act, and (iii) the institution’s enabling statutes.

Except as specifically made inapplicable under this article or the express terms of a management agreement, the provisions of Title 2.2 relating generally to the operation, management, supervision, regulation, and control of public institutions of higher education are applicable to covered institutions as provided by the express terms of the management agreement.

In the event of a conflict between any provision of Title 2.2 and any provision of the management agreement, the provisions of the management agreement control. In the event of a conflict between any provision of this article and an institution’s enabling statutes, the enabling statutes control.

The provisions of the State and Local Government Conflict of Interests Act (§

2.2-3100

et seq.) that are applicable to officers and employees of a state governmental agency shall continue to apply to the members of the governing board and the covered employees of a covered institution.

A covered institution, its officers, directors, employees, and agents, and the members of its governing board are entitled to the same sovereign immunity to which they would be entitled if the institution were not governed by this article.

The Virginia Tort Claims Act (§

8.01-195.1

et seq.) and its limitations on recoveries remain applicable to covered institutions.

A management agreement with a public institution of higher education shall not grant restructured operational authority to the Virginia Cooperative Extension Service and Agricultural Experiment Station Division, the University of Virginia’s College at Wise, the Virginia Institute of Marine Science, or an affiliated entity of the institution unless the intent to grant such authority and the degree to which such authority is granted is expressly included in the management agreement.

For purposes of §§

23.1-101

,

23.1-102

,

23.1-103

,

23.1-104

, and

23.1-107

, Chapter 2 (§

23.1-200

et seq.), §§

23.1-306

,

23.1-402

,

23.1-403

, and

23.1-404

, Chapter 5 (§

23.1-500

et seq.), Chapter 6 (§

23.1-600

et seq.), Chapter 7 (§

23.1-700

et seq.), §§

23.1-800

,

23.1-801

,

23.1-901

, and

23.1-1001

, Chapter 11 (§

23.1-1100

et seq.), Chapter 12 (§

23.1-1200

et seq.), subsections G, H, and I of §

23.1-1300

, §

23.1-1302

, and subdivision B of §

23.1-1303

, each covered institution shall remain a public institution of higher education following its conversion to a covered institution governed by this article and shall retain the authority granted and any obligations required by such provisions.

State government-owned or operated and state-owned teaching hospitals that are a part of a covered institution as of the effective date of the covered institution’s initial management agreement shall continue to be characterized as state government-owned or operated and state-owned teaching hospitals for purposes of payments under the state plan for medical assistance services adopted pursuant to §

32.1-325

, provided that the covered institution commits to serve indigent and medically indigent patients. If such covered institution commits to serve indigent and medically indigent patients, the Commonwealth, through the Department of Medical Assistance Services, shall, subject to the appropriation in the current general appropriation act, continue to reimburse the full cost of the provision of care, treatment, health-related services, and educational services to indigent and medically indigent patients and continue to treat hospitals that were part of a covered institution and that were Type One Hospitals prior to the effective date of the covered institution’s initial management agreement as Type One Hospitals for purposes of such reimbursement.

Consistent with the terms of the management agreement, the governing board of each covered institution shall assume full responsibility for management of the institution, subject to the requirements and conditions set forth in this article and the management agreement, and shall be fully accountable for meeting the requirements of §§

23.1-206

,

23.1-306

, and

23.1-310

and such other provisions as may be set forth in the management agreement.

History.

2005, cc. 933, 945, §§ 23-38.88, 23-38.91, 23-38.92, 23-38.93, 23-38.96, 23-38.97; 2006, c. 775; 2009, cc. 827, 845; 2011, cc. 828, 869; 2013, c. 482; 2014, cc. 484, 628, 815; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-1007.
Management agreement; duration and oversight.

Each initial management agreement shall remain in effect for a period of three years. Subsequent management agreements shall remain in effect for a period of five years.

If an existing management agreement is not renewed or a new management agreement is not executed prior to the expiration date, the existing agreement shall remain in effect on a provisional basis for a period not to exceed one year. If, after the expiration of the provisional one-year period, the management agreement has not been renewed or a new agreement has not been executed, the public institution of higher education shall not exercise such restructured operational authority until it enters into a new management agreement with the Commonwealth.

The Joint Legislative Audit and Review Commission, in cooperation with the Auditor of Public Accounts, shall review, for at least the first 24 months from the effective date of the management agreement, the level of compliance with the expressed terms of the management agreement, the degree to which the covered institution has demonstrated its ability to manage successfully the administrative and financial operations of the institution without jeopardizing the financial integrity and stability of the institution, the degree to which the covered institution is meeting the state goals set forth in subsection A of §

23.1-1002

, and any impact that the management agreement has had on students and employees of the covered institution. The Joint Legislative Audit and Review Commission shall make a written report of its review no later than June 30 of the third year of the management agreement. The Joint Legislative Audit and Review Commission may conduct a similar review of any management agreement entered into subsequent to the initial agreement.

The Auditor of Public Accounts or his legally authorized representatives shall audit annually accounts of all covered institutions and shall distribute copies of each annual audit to the Governor and to the Chairmen of the House Committee on Appropriations and the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations. Pursuant to § 30-133, the Auditor of Public Accounts and his legally authorized representatives shall examine annually the accounts and books of each such institution, but no covered institution shall be deemed a state or governmental agency, advisory agency, public body, or agency or instrumentality for purposes of Chapter 14 (§ 30-130 et seq.) of Title 30 except for those provisions in such chapter that relate to requirements for financial recordkeeping and bookkeeping. Each covered institution is subject to such other reviews and audits as are required by law.

If the Governor makes a written determination that the covered institution is not in substantial compliance with the terms of the management agreement or with the requirements of this chapter, he shall provide a copy of that written determination to the chairman or rector of the governing board of the covered institution and to the General Assembly, and the covered institution shall develop and implement a plan of corrective action. The covered institution shall provide a copy of such corrective action plan to the Governor and General Assembly. If the Governor determines that the covered institution is not yet in substantial compliance with the management agreement or the requirements of this chapter after a reasonable period of time following the implementation of the corrective action plan, the Governor may void the management agreement and the institution’s status as a covered institution shall terminate and it shall not exercise such restructured operational authority until the institution enters into a subsequent management agreement with the Cabinet Secretary designated by the Governor or the voided management agreement is reinstated by the General Assembly.

An institution’s status as a covered institution may be revoked by an act of the General Assembly if the institution fails to meet the requirements of this article or the management agreement.

History.

2005, cc. 933, 945, §§ 23-38.88, 23-38.94. 23-38.98; 2006, c. 775; 2009, cc. 827, 845; 2011, cc. 828, 869; 2013, c. 482; 2014, c. 628; 2016, c. 588.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2019, cc. 124 and
125, cl. 1 enacted a management agreement by and between the Commonwealth of Virginia and James Madison University.

Acts
2019, cc. 124 and
125, cl. 2 provides: “That notwithstanding the provisions of subsections A and B of
§

23.1-1007

of the Code of Virginia, the management agreement negotiated by James Madison University (the University) shall continue in effect unless the Governor, the General Assembly, or the University determines that the management agreement needs to be renegotiated or revised.”

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations” for “Senate Committee on Finance.” March 10, 2021.

Acts
2021,
Sp. Sess. I, cc. 76 and
77, cl. 1 enacted a management agreement by and between the Commonwealth of Virginia and George Mason University.

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 76 and
77, cl. 2 provides: “That notwithstanding the provisions of subsections A and B of
§

23.1-1007

of the Code of Virginia, the management agreement negotiated by George Mason University (the University) shall continue in effect unless the Governor, the General Assembly, or the University determine that the management agreement needs to be renegotiated or revised.”

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Wage requirements under public work contracts. —

Unless otherwise exempted by specific statutes outside of the Virginia Public Procurement Act ( §

2.2-4300

et seq.), the prevailing wage requirements for public works contracts under the Virginia Public Procurement Act apply to institutions of higher education in Virginia. See opinion of Attorney General to Hon. Mark D. Sickles, Member, House of Delegates, 21-041, 2021 Va. AG LEXIS 18 (5/24/21).

§ 23.1-1008.
Covered institutions; operational authority generally.

In addition to those powers granted in each covered institution’s enabling statutes and the general appropriation act, each covered institution, subject to the express provisions of the management agreement, may exercise all the powers necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes and provisions of this article and:

Make and execute contracts, guarantees, or any other instruments and agreements necessary or convenient to the exercise of its powers, authority, and functions, including contracts with persons to (i) operate and manage any or all of the covered institution’s facilities or operations and (ii) incur liabilities and secure the obligations of any entity or individual, provided, however, that no covered institution may pledge the faith and credit of the Commonwealth or enter into an indemnification agreement or binding arbitration agreement contrary to state law;

Conduct or engage in any lawful business, activity, effort, or project consistent with the covered institution’s purposes or necessary or convenient to the exercise of its powers; and

Procure insurance, participate in insurance plans, provide self-insurance, continue participation in the Commonwealth’s insurance or self-insurance plans, continue participation in the Commonwealth’s risk management programs, and continue participation in the Virginia Retirement System or other Commonwealth sponsored retirement plans subject to the conditions in §§

23.1-1020

through

23.1-1026

, and any combination of the foregoing, as provided in this article. The purchase of insurance, participation in an insurance plan, or creation of a self-insurance plan by the covered institution shall not be deemed a waiver or relinquishment of any sovereign immunity to which the covered institution or its officers, directors, employees, or agents are otherwise entitled. Covered institutions may participate in any Commonwealth or Virginia Retirement System insurance, self-insurance, or risk management program on the same terms and conditions applicable to other state agencies and other public institutions of higher education.

History.

2005, cc. 933, 945, § 23-38.99; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-1009.
Covered institutions; operational authority; projects.

Each covered institution may acquire, plan, design, construct, own, rent as landlord or tenant, operate, control, remove, renovate, enlarge, equip, and maintain, directly or through stock or nonstock corporations or other entities, any project. Such project may be owned or operated by the institution, other persons, or jointly by such institution and other persons and may be operated within or outside the Commonwealth as long as (i) the operations of such project are necessary or desirable to assist the institution in carrying out its public purposes within the Commonwealth and (ii) any private benefit resulting to any such other private persons from any such project is merely incidental to the public benefit of such project.

Each covered institution may continue, adopt, and enforce policies for the operation of any facility, including any veterinary facility, hospital, or other health care and related facility owned or operated by the institution. Any such policies pertaining to the operation of any veterinary facility, hospital, or other health care or related facility may include the conditions of practicing any health profession or veterinary medicine in the facility, the admission and treatment of patients, the procedures for determining the qualification of patients for indigent care or other programs, and the protection of patients and employees, provided that such policies do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, or any other factor prohibited by law.

History.

2005, cc. 933, 945, § 23-38.100; 2016, c. 588; 2020, c. 1137.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1137, inserted “sexual orientation, gender identity” in the last sentence of subsection B.

§ 23.1-1010.
Covered institutions; operational authority; creation of entities and participation in joint ventures.

Each covered institution may:

Create or assist in the creation of; own in whole or in part or otherwise control; participate in or with any entities, public or private; and purchase, receive, subscribe for, own, hold, vote, use, employ, sell, mortgage, lend, pledge, or otherwise acquire or dispose of any (i) shares or obligations of, or other interests in, any entity organized for any purpose within or outside the Commonwealth and (ii) obligations of any person or corporation. No part of the assets or net earnings of such institution shall inure to the benefit of, or be distributable to, any private individual except that reasonable compensation may be paid for services rendered to or for such institution in furtherance of its public purposes and benefits may be conferred that are in conformity with its public purposes.

Participate in joint ventures with individuals, corporations, governmental bodies or agencies, partnerships, associations, insurers, or other entities to facilitate any activities or programs consistent with its public purposes and the intent of this article.

Create or continue the existence of one or more nonprofit entities for the purpose of soliciting, accepting, managing, and administering grants and gifts and bequests, including endowment gifts and bequests and gifts and bequests in trust.

In carrying out any activities authorized by this article, provide appropriate assistance, including (i) making loans from its funds, other than general fund appropriations or proceeds of bonds issued under Article X, Section 9 (a), 9 (b), or 9 (c) of the Constitution of Virginia or under Article X, Section 9 (d) of the Constitution of Virginia if such issuance is supported by general funds and (ii) providing the time of its employees to corporations, partnerships, associations, joint ventures, or other entities whether such entities are owned or controlled in whole or in part or directly or indirectly by such institution.

History.

2005, cc. 933, 945, § 23-38.101; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-1011.
Covered institutions; operational authority; campus police.

A covered institution may establish or continue to operate a campus police department in accordance with the provisions of Article 3 (§

23.1-809

et seq.) of Chapter 8. Campus police shall possess the powers provided in Article 3 of Chapter 8, except that a covered institution’s employment of campus police is governed by the provisions of this article rather than by Chapter 28 (§

2.2-2800

et seq.) and Chapter 29 (§

2.2-2900

et seq.) of Title 2.2.

Campus police officers of a covered institution are eligible to participate in the same state-sponsored retirement plans on the same terms and conditions as campus police officers of other public institutions of higher education.

History.

2005, cc. 933, 945, § 23-38.102; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-1012.
Covered institutions; operational authority; financial operations generally.

Each covered institution may (i) independently manage its operations and finances, including holding and investing its tuition, fees, research funds, and auxiliary enterprise funds and all other public funds; (ii) create any policy deemed necessary to conduct its financial operations; (iii) adopt the budget for the institution; and (iv) control the expenditures of all moneys generated or received by the institution, including tuition, fees, and other nongeneral fund revenue sources.

Subject to the express terms of the management agreement, the governing board of each covered institution has the sole authority to establish tuition, mandatory fees, room and board, and other necessary charges consistent with sum sufficient appropriation authority for all nongeneral funds as provided by the Governor and the General Assembly in the general appropriation act. In the event that the institution retains any nongeneral funds, it shall invest such funds consistent with an investment policy established by the governing board and retain all income earned on such investments. In the event that the Commonwealth holds any nongeneral funds on behalf of the institution, the institution shall receive a share of the income earned by the Commonwealth on the investment of such funds as provided in subsection C of §

23.1-1002

.

The governing board of each covered institution shall include in its six-year plan pursuant to §

23.1-306

its commitment to providing need-based grant aid for middle-income and lower-income Virginia students in a manner that encourages student enrollment and progression without respect to potential increases in tuition and fees.

Each covered institution’s management agreement shall include the quantification of cost savings realized as a result of the restructured operational authority pursuant to this article.

Each covered institution may enter into any contract that it determines to be necessary or appropriate to place any bond or investment of the institution, in whole or in part, on the interest rate, cash flow, or other basis desired by the institution, including contracts commonly known as interest rate swap agreements, futures, and contracts providing for payments based on levels of, or changes in, interest rates. Each covered institution may enter into such contracts in connection with, incidental to, or for the purpose of entering into or maintaining any (i) agreement that secures bonds, notes, or other obligations or (ii) investment or contract providing for investment, otherwise authorized by law, including §

23.1-1013

. Such contracts may contain such payment, security, default, remedy, and other terms and conditions as determined by the institution after giving due consideration to the creditworthiness of the counterpart or other obligated party, including any rating by any nationally recognized rating agency, and any other criteria that may be appropriate. Any money set aside and pledged to secure payments of bonds, notes, or other obligations or any contract entered into pursuant to this section may be pledged to and used to service any such contract.

The governing board of each covered institution shall adopt a system of independent financial management that includes bookkeeping and accounting procedures that have been prescribed for governmental organizations by the Government Accounting Standards Board.

History.

2005, cc. 933, 945, §§ 23-38.104, 23-38.106; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-1013.
Covered institutions; operational authority; financial operations; investment of operating funds.

Each covered institution may invest its operating funds in any obligations or securities that are considered legal investments for public funds in accordance with Chapter 45 (§

2.2-4500

et seq.) of Title 2.2. Such institution’s governing board shall adopt written investment guidelines that provide that such investments shall be made solely in the interest of the covered institution and shall be undertaken with the care, skill, prudence, and diligence under the circumstances then prevailing that a prudent person acting in a like capacity and familiar with such matters would use in the conduct of an enterprise of a like character and with like aims.

History.

2005, cc. 933, 945, § 23-38.105; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-1014.
Covered institutions; operational authority; financial operations; financing and indebtedness.

Each covered institution may:

Borrow money and issue bonds, notes, or other obligations as provided in this article and purchase such bonds, notes, or other obligations;

Seek financing from, incur, or assume indebtedness to, and enter into contractual commitments with, the Virginia Public Building Authority and the Virginia College Building Authority, which authorities may borrow money and make and issue negotiable notes, bonds, notes, or other obligations to provide such financing relating to facilities or any project; and

Seek financing from, incur or assume indebtedness to, and enter into contractual commitments with, the Commonwealth as otherwise provided by law relating to the institution’s facilities or any project.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this chapter, no covered institution is exempt from any requirement or covenant contained in any outstanding bonds, notes, or other obligations.

History.

2005, cc. 933, 945, § 23-38.107; 2016, c. 588; 2017, c. 314.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2017, c. 314, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall be effective retroactively to October 1, 2016.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 314, effective retroactively to October 1, 2016, substituted “may borrow” for “are authorized to borrow” in subdivision A 2.

§ 23.1-1015.
Covered institutions; operational authority; financial operations; power to issue bonds, notes, or other obligations.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

23.1-1119

, a covered institution may (i) issue bonds, notes, or other obligations for any purpose that is consistent with its institutional mission, including to (a) finance or refinance any project, (b) appropriately manage operational cash flows, (c) provide for short-term financing, (d) refund bonds, notes, or other obligations issued by or on behalf of such institution, or otherwise, including bonds, notes, or other obligations or obligations not then subject to redemption, and (ii) guarantee, assume, or otherwise agree to pay, in whole or in part, indebtedness issued by such institution or any affiliated entity for managing operational cash flows or resulting in the acquisition or construction of facilities for the benefit of such institution or the refinancing thereof.

Nothing in this article shall preclude a covered institution from participation in any financing program or bond issue established and implemented by the Commonwealth or any agency of the Commonwealth, including (i) any financing program or bond issue under Article X, Section 9 (b) or 9 (c) of the Constitution of Virginia and (ii) any financing program or bond issue under Article X, Section 9 (d) of the Constitution of Virginia undertaken by the Treasury Board, the Virginia College Building Authority, or the Virginia Public Building Authority if such institution is otherwise eligible and approved to participate and is otherwise able to fulfill any requirements that may be imposed upon it by virtue of its participation.

Notwithstanding Article 8 (§

2.2-2415

et seq.) of Chapter 24 of Title 2.2, Chapter 11 (§

23.1-1100

et seq.), and §

23.1-2205

, each covered institution may issue bonds, notes, or other obligations consistent with debt capacity and management policies and guidelines established by its governing board without (i) obtaining the consent of any legislative body, elected official, commission, board, bureau, political subdivision, or agency of the Commonwealth; (ii) any proceedings or conditions other than those specifically required by this article; (iii) the approval required by the provisions of Article 8 (§

2.2-2415

et seq.) of Chapter 24 of Title 2.2; or (iv) any regulation or procedure, including a review or approval procedure, adopted pursuant to Chapter 11 (§

23.1-1100

et seq.).

Each covered institution may issue such types of bonds, notes, or other obligations as it determines are appropriate and consistent with debt capacity and management policies and guidelines established by its governing board, including bonds, notes, or other obligations payable as to principal and interest from any one or more of the following sources: (i) its revenues generally; (ii) income and revenues derived from the operation, sale, or lease of a particular project, whether or not it is financed or refinanced from the proceeds of such bonds, notes, or other obligations; (iii) funds realized from the enforcement of security interests or other liens or obligations securing such bonds, notes, or other obligations; (iv) proceeds from the sale of bonds, notes, or other obligations; (v) payments under letters of credit, policies of municipal bond insurance, guarantees, or other credit enhancements; (vi) any reserve or sinking funds created to secure such payment; (vii) accounts receivable of such institution; or (viii) other available funds of such institution.

Any bonds, notes, or other obligations may be supported by any grant, contribution, or appropriation from a participating political subdivision, the covered institution, the Commonwealth, any political subdivision, agency, or instrumentality of the Commonwealth, any federal agency, or any unit, private corporation, partnership, association, or individual.

Bonds, notes, or other obligations of a covered institution are for an essential public and governmental purpose.

It is lawful for any bank or trust company within or outside the Commonwealth to serve as depository of the proceeds of bonds, notes, or other obligations or other revenues of a covered institution, furnish indemnifying bonds, notes, or other obligations, or pledge such securities as may be required by such institution, provided that any such deposits are collateralized in accordance with the Security for Public Deposits Act (§

2.2-4400

et seq.) in the case of a bank or savings institution or Article 3 (§

6.2-1047

et seq.) of Chapter 10 of Title 6.2 in the case of a trust company.

History.

2005, cc. 933, 945, § 23-38.108; 2016, c. 588.